Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1208
Secretary of State; use of substitute address; exceptions.

The Secretary of State shall not make any records in a program participant's file available for inspection or copying, other than the substitute address designated by the Secretary of State, except under the following circumstances:

(1) If requested of the Secretary of State by the chief commanding officer of a law enforcement agency or the officer's designee in the manner provided for by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Secretary of State;

(2) To a person identified in a court order upon the receipt by the Secretary of State of that court order which specifically orders the disclosure of a particular program participant's address and the reasons stated therefor; or

(3) To verify the participation of a specific program participant, in which case the Secretary of State may only confirm or deny information supplied by the requester.

Laws 2003, LB 228, § 8.